lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Biuro instrumentai > Segikliai: Knygų įrišimo segikliai; Elektriniai segikliai; Visos kabių juostos segikliai; Pusės kabių juostos segikliai; Didelės galios segikliai; Ilgi segikliai; Minisegikliai; Repliniai segikliai; Brošiūrų segikliai
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Kantoorbenodigdheden > Nietapparaten: Nietapparaten voor boekbinden; Elektrische nietapparaten; Nietapparaten met volledige strip; Nietapparaten met halve strip; Nietapparaten voor zwaar gebruik; Nietapparaten met groot bereik; Mininietapparaten; Nietapparaten met tang; Zadelnietapparaten
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Офисные принадлежности > Степлеры: Брошюровочные степлеры; Электрические степлеры; Степлеры полной загрузки; Степлеры половинной загрузки; Мощные степлеры; Длинные степлеры; Мини-степлеры; Степлеры-плаеры; Степлеры для скрепления в накидку
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Toimistovälineet > Nitojat: Kirjansidontanitojat; Sähkönitojat; Kokorivinitojat; Puolirivinitojat; Nitojat raskaaseen käyttöön; Pitkävartiset nitojat; Mininitojat; Pihtinitojat; Satulanitojat
es: Material de oficina > Artículos de oficina > Grapadoras: Grapadoras de encuadernación; Grapadoras eléctricas; Grapadoras de tira completa; Grapadoras de media tira; Grapadoras de alta resistencia; Grapadoras de largo alcance; Mini grapadoras; Grapadoras de pinza; Grapadoras de caballete
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 事務用品 > 釘書機: 裝訂訂書機; 電動訂書機; 全條訂書機; 半條訂書機; 重型訂書機; 長軸訂書機; 迷你訂書機; 鉗型訂書機; 鞍式訂書機
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kancelárske nástroje > Zošívačky: Kníhviazačské zošívačky; Elektrické zošívačky; Zošívačky s úplnou kapacitou zošívania; Zošívačky s polovičnou kapacitou zošívania; Veľkokapacitné zošívačky; Zošívačky s dlhým dosahom; Mini zošívačky; Kliešťové zošívačky; Sedlové zošívačky
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Dụng cụ văn phòng > Dập ghim: Dập ghim đóng sách; Dập ghim điện; Dập ghim nguyên dải; Dập ghim nửa dải; Bấm kim lớn; Dập ghim dài; Dập ghim mini; Kìm bấm ghim; Dập ghim hình yên ngựa
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Uredski uređaji > Klamerice: Klamerice za uvezivanje knjiga; Električne klamerice; Klamerice za punu traku; Klamerice za pola trake; Velike klamerice; Dugačke klamerice; Mini klamerice; Klamerice u obliku kliješta; Klamerice sa sedlom
hu: Irodai kellékek > Irodai eszközök > Tűzőgépek: Könyvkötő tűzőgépek; Elektromos tűzőgépek; Teljes szalagos tűzőgépek; Félszalagos tűzőgépek; Nagy teljesítményű tűzőgépek; Hosszú kinyúlású tűzőgépek; Mini tűzőgépek; Fogó tűzőgépek; Nyereg tűzőgépek
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Όργανα γραφείου > Συρραπτικά: Συρραπτικά βιβλιοδεσίας; Ηλεκτρικά συρραπτικά; Συρραπτικά πλήρους λωρίδας; Συρραπτικά μισής λωρίδας; Συρραπτικά βαρέως τύπου; Συρραπτικά με μακρύ βραχίονα; Μίνι συρραπτικά; Συρραπτικά τύπου πένσας; Συρραπτικά καμπυλωτών συρραφών
ja: オフィス用品 > 事務用品 > ホッチキス: 製本ホッチキス; 電動ホッチキス; フルストリップホッチキス; ハーフストリップホッチキス; 大型ホッチキス; ロングリーチホッチキス; ミニホッチキス; プライヤーホッチキス; サドルホッチキス
en: Office Supplies > Office Instruments > Staplers: Bookbinding Staplers; Electric Staplers; Full Strip Staplers; Half Strip Staplers; Heavy Duty Staplers; Long Reach Staplers; Mini Staplers; Plier Staplers; Saddle Staplers
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Kancelářské nástroje > Sešívačky: Sešívačky pro knižní vazbu; Elektrické sešívačky; Sešívačky plné velikosti; Sešívačky poloviční velikosti; Průmyslové sešívačky; Sešívačky s prodlouženým ramenem; Miniaturní sešívačky; Sponkovací kleště; Sedlové sešívačky
it: Forniture per ufficio > Strumenti per ufficio > Graffettatrici: Cucitrici per rilegatura; Cucitrici elettriche; Cucitrici a striscia intera; Cucitrici a mezza striscia; Cucitrici pesanti; Cucitrici a lunga portata; Mini cucitrici; Cucitrici a pinza; Cucitrici per sella
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Akcesoria biurowe > Zszywacze: Zszywacze introligatorskie; Zszywacze elektryczne; Duże zszywacze; Małe zszywacze; Zszywacze do dużych obciążeń; Zszywacze głęboko wsuwane; Minizszywacze; Zszywacze nożycowe; Zszywacze siodłowe
de: Bürobedarf > Büroarbeitsmittel > Heftgeräte: Hefter zum Buchbinden; Elektrische Hefter; Vollstreifenhefter; Halbstreifenhefter; Hochleistungshefter; Langarmhefter; Mini-Hefter; Zangenhefter; Sattelhefter
nb: Kontormateriell > Kontorinstrumenter > Stiftemaskiner: Bokbindstiftemaskiner; Elektriske stiftemaskiner; Helstrimmelstiftemaskiner; Halvstrimmelstiftemaskiner; Kraftige stiftemaskiner; Stiftemaskiner med lang rekkevidde; Ministiftemaskiner; Tangstiftere; Sadelstiftemaskiner
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 办公文具 > 订书机: 装订订书机; 电动订书机; 全开订书机; 半开订书机; 重型订书机; 长臂订书机; 迷你订书机; 钳式订书机; 鞍式订书机
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pisarniški pripomočki > Spenjači: Spenjači za vezavo knjig; Električni spenjači; Spenjači za celoten paket sponk; Spenjači za polovičen paket sponk; Spenjači za velike obremenitve; Spenjači z dolgim dosegom; Mini spenjači; Spenjači z ročajem; Spenjači za brošure
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Kontorsinstrument > Häftapparater: Bokbindningshäftapparater; Elektriska häftapparater; Helbandshäftapparater; Halvbandshäftapparater; Kraftiga häftapparater; Häftapparater med lång räckvidd; Minihäftapparater; Tånghäftapparater; Sadelhäftapparater
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Material de escritório > Agrafadores: Agrafadores para encadernação; Agrafadores elétricos; Agrafadores para fileiras de agrafos; Agrafadores para meias fileiras de agrafos; Agrafadores industriais; Agrafadores de longo alcance; Miniagrafadores; Alicates de agrafar; Agrafadores para lombada
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Офис инструменти > Телбоди: Телбоди за подвързване на книги; Електрически телбоди; Телбоди за цяла лента със скобички; Телбоди за половин лента със скобички; Професионални телбоди; Телбоди с голям обхват; Мини телбоди; Телбоди тип „клещи“; Телбоди за съединяване на гърба на листовете
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > เครื่องมือสำนักงาน > ที่เย็บกระดาษ: เครื่องเย็บแบบเข้าเล่ม; เครื่องเย็บกระดาษไฟฟ้า; เครื่องเย็บกระดาษแบบเต็มแถบ; เครื่องเย็บกระดาษแบบครึ่งแถบ; เครื่องเย็บกระดาษสำหรับงานหนัก; เครื่องเย็บกระดาษระยะยาว; เครื่องเย็บกระดาษขนาดเล็ก; เครื่องเย็บกระดาษประหยัดแรง; เครื่องเย็บมุงหลังคา
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Accessoires de bureau > Agrafeuses: Agrafeuses de reliure; Agrafeuses électriques; Agrafeuses à bande complète; Agrafeuses demi-bande; Agrafeuses robustes; Agrafeuses longue portée; Mini-agrafeuses; Agrafeuses à pinces; Agrafeuses à selle
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Instrumente de birou > Capsatoare: Capsatoare pentru legat; Capsatoare electrice; Capsatoare cu bandă completă; Capsatoare cu jumătate de bandă; Capsatoare industriale; Capsatoare lungi; Capsatoare mini; Capsatoare tip clește; Capsatoare cu platformă
da: Kontorforsyning > Kontorredskaber > Hæftemaskiner: Bogbinderhæftemaskiner; Elektriske hæftemaskiner; Helstrimmelhæftemaskiner; Halvstrimmelhæftemaskiner; Kraftige hæftemaskiner; Lange hæftemaskiner; Minihæftemaskiner; Tanghæftemaskiner; Sadelhæftemaskiner
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Instrumentos de escritório > Grampeadores: Grampeadores de encadernação; Grampeadores elétricos; Grampeadores de tira completa; Grampeadores de meia tira; Grampeadores para serviços pesados; Grampeadores de longo alcance; Minigrampeadores; Grampeadores alicate; Grampeadores de sela
ko: 사무용품 > 사무기구 > 스테이플러: 제본 스테이플러; 전기 스테이플러; 일반침 스테이플러; 단침 스테이플러; 대용량 스테이플러; 롱 리치 스테이플러; 미니 스테이플러; 플라이 스테이플러; 새들 스테이플러
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Ofis Aletleri > Zımbalar: Ciltleme Zımbaları; Elektrikli Zımbalar; Tam Şerit Zımbalar; Yarım Şerit Zımbalar; Profesyonel Zımbalar; Uzun Erişimli Zımbalar; Mini Zımbalar; Pense Zımbalar; Sırt Zımbaları